Massachusetts, session 194th, H1960.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 130 of chapter 127 of the General Laws, as amended by St.2018, c. 72, § 6, eff.
Jan. 13, 2019, is hereby amended by striking the first four sentences and inserting in place
thereof the following paragraphs:-
Unless the parole board determines by clear and convincing evidence that, if the prisoner
is released with appropriate conditions and community supervision, the prisoner will not live and
remain at liberty without violating the law, a parole permit shall be granted at a prisoner's first
date of parole eligibility and at any subsequent review hearing. The parole board shall make this
determination using structured, actuarially based parole guidelines and the findings of a validated
risk and needs assessment tool, both of which must consider the prisoner's participation in
available work opportunities, educational opportunities and treatment program and the prisoner's
demonstrated good behavior. The parole board shall also consider whether risk reduction
programs, made available through collaboration with criminal justice agencies, community
of 2

organizations, or with the Department of Mental Health or Department of Public Health, and
other aspects of the prisoner's parole plan would minimize the probability of the prisoner re-
offending once released.
For any prisoner with a disability, the parole board must consider whether provision of
reasonable accommodations will enable the prisoner to live and remain at liberty without
violating the law. If a prisoner has a disability that may impair the ability of the prisoner to be
successful on parole, the parole board shall, in collaboration with counsel, where applicable,
arrange for a psychological or medical examination to ascertain and evaluate the nature of the
risk posed by the disability and to identify any services, supports, or programs that might
mitigate the risk. The parole board shall consider the examination in making its decision.
Upon issuance of a grant of parole to anyone who needs specialized care due to bodily
infirmity, disease, or mental or developmental disability, and who is unable to secure a home
plan, the parole board shall notify the Commissioner of the Department of Public Health or the
Commissioner of the Department of Mental Health, as appropriate, who shall secure a medically
appropriate placement for such prisoner within 60 days. No individual who has been granted
parole shall remain incarcerated for failure to secure an appropriate home plan.
of 2